Washington statutes.
RCW 43.33.130

Summary of debt management activities and debt issuances.

The state finance committee must publish a summary of debt management activities at least annually and must also publish the results of each debt issuance in a timely manner upon conclusion of each debt issuance. The state finance committee, in its discretion, may publish these materials exclusively by electronic means on the office of the state treasurer's website if it is determined that public access to these materials is not substantially diminished.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2; 1998 c 245 s 63; 1981 c 3 s 25; 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.